Illinois, session 104th, HB4756.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 12-9 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/12-9)  (from Ch. 23, par. 12-9)7    Sec. 12-9. Public Aid Recoveries Trust Fund; uses. The 8Public Aid Recoveries Trust Fund shall consist of (1) 9recoveries by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 10(formerly Illinois Department of Public Aid) authorized by 11this Code in respect to applicants or recipients under 12Articles III, IV, V, and VI, including recoveries made by the 13Department of Healthcare and Family Services (formerly 14Illinois Department of Public Aid) from the estates of 15deceased recipients, (2) recoveries made by the Department of 16Healthcare and Family Services (formerly Illinois Department 17of Public Aid) in respect to applicants and recipients under 18the Children's Health Insurance Program Act, and the Covering 19ALL KIDS Health Insurance Act, (2.5) recoveries made by the 20Department of Healthcare and Family Services in connection 21with the imposition of an administrative penalty as provided 22under Section 12-4.45, (3) federal funds received on behalf of 23and earned by State universities, other State agencies or   HB4756 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 20182 KTG 33633 b1departments, and local governmental entities for services 2provided to applicants or recipients covered under this Code, 3the Children's Health Insurance Program Act, and the Covering 4ALL KIDS Health Insurance Act, (3.5) federal financial 5participation revenue related to eligible disbursements made 6by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services from 7appropriations required by this Section, and (4) all other 8moneys received to the Fund, including interest thereon. The 9Fund shall be held as a special fund in the State Treasury.10    Disbursements from this Fund shall be only (1) for the 11reimbursement of claims collected by the Department of 12Healthcare and Family Services (formerly Illinois Department 13of Public Aid) through error or mistake, (2) for payment to 14persons or agencies designated as payees or co-payees on any 15instrument, whether or not negotiable, delivered to the 16Department of Healthcare and Family Services (formerly 17Illinois Department of Public Aid) as a recovery under this 18Section, such payment to be in proportion to the respective 19interests of the payees in the amount so collected, (3) for 20payments to the Department of Human Services for collections 21made by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 22(formerly Illinois Department of Public Aid) on behalf of the 23Department of Human Services under this Code, the Children's 24Health Insurance Program Act, and the Covering ALL KIDS Health 25Insurance Act, (4) for payment of administrative expenses 26incurred in performing the activities authorized under this   HB4756 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 20182 KTG 33633 b1Code, the Children's Health Insurance Program Act, and the 2Covering ALL KIDS Health Insurance Act, (5) for payment of 3fees to persons or agencies in the performance of activities 4pursuant to the collection of monies owed the State that are 5collected under this Code, the Children's Health Insurance 6Program Act, and the Covering ALL KIDS Health Insurance Act, 7(6) separate from those disbursements allowed under items (4) 8and (5), for payment of contingency fees to third-party 9entities that the Office of Inspector General authorizes to 10conduct audits under Sections 12-4.25 and 12-4.40, or any 11similar audits required by State or federal law, (7) for 12payments of any amounts which are reimbursable to the federal 13government which are required to be paid by State warrant by 14either the State or federal government, and (8) (7) for 15payments to State universities, other State agencies or 16departments, and local governmental entities of federal funds 17for services provided to applicants or recipients covered 18under this Code, the Children's Health Insurance Program Act, 19and the Covering ALL KIDS Health Insurance Act. Disbursements 20from this Fund for purposes of items (4) and (5) of this 21paragraph shall be subject to appropriations from the Fund to 22the Department of Healthcare and Family Services (formerly 23Illinois Department of Public Aid).24    The balance in this Fund after payment therefrom of any 25amounts reimbursable to the federal government, and minus the 26amount anticipated to be needed to make the disbursements   HB4756 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 20182 KTG 33633 b1authorized by this Section, shall be certified by the Director 2of Healthcare and Family Services and transferred by the State 3Comptroller to the Drug Rebate Fund or the Healthcare Provider 4Relief Fund in the State Treasury, as appropriate, on at least 5an annual basis by June 30th of each fiscal year. The Director 6of Healthcare and Family Services may certify and the State 7Comptroller shall transfer to the Drug Rebate Fund or the 8Healthcare Provider Relief Fund amounts on a more frequent 9basis. 10(Source: P.A. 103-593, eff. 6-7-24.)